Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.300

Delivery of person in violation of RCW 10.88.290—Penalty.

Any officer who shall deliver to the agent for extradition of the demanding state a person in his or her custody under the governor's warrant, in wilful [willful] disobedience to RCW 10.88.290, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and, on conviction, shall be imprisoned in the county jail for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or be fined not more than one thousand dollars, or both.

[ 2011 c 96 s 14; 2010 c 8 s 1073; 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 11.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.